Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1114.14
Interpretation of sections.

Sections 23-1114.02 to 23-1114.07 and 23-1114.09 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate their general purpose, to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation as therein provided for the county officers affected thereby and to give effect to such salaries as soon as same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 164, § 8, p. 741.